Washington statutes.
RCW 19.250.070

Application of chapter—Limitations.

(1) The provision or maintenance of a subscriber's wireless phone number is not prohibited by this chapter when the number is provided or maintained by:

(a) Any law enforcement agency, fire protection agency, public health agency, public environmental health agency, city or county emergency services planning agency, or corporation operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one or more of these agencies, when carrying out official duties;

(b) A person carrying out a lawful order or process issued under state or federal law;

(c) A telecommunications company providing service between service areas for the provision of telephone services to the subscriber between service areas, or to third parties for the limited purpose of providing billing services;

(d) A telecommunications company to effectuate a customer's request to transfer the customer's assigned telephone number from the customer's existing provider of telecommunications services to a new provider of telecommunications services;

(e) The utilities and transportation commission pursuant to its jurisdiction and control over telecommunications companies;

(f) A sales agent to provide the subscriber's wireless phone numbers to the radio communications service company for the limited purpose of billing and customer service;

(g) A directory provider via a directory that is obtained directly from a radio communications service company and that radio communications service company has obtained the required express, opt-in consent for including in any directory the subscriber's wireless phone number as specified in RCW 19.250.010;

(h) A person via a directory where the subscriber pays a fee to have the number published for commercial purposes;

(i) A person who ported the number from listed wireline service to wireless service within the previous fifteen months;

(j) A person for uses permitted or authorized under the federal fair credit reporting act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681(b)), or for uses permitted or authorized under Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 6801, et seq.); and

(k) A person in comprehensive reports or public records when the public record is not altered from its original form. For purposes of this subsection, a comprehensive report means law enforcement investigations, risk and security analysis for employment or vendor evaluation, legal research and case management, legal compliance analysis, and academic research.

(2) The provision of a subscriber's wireless phone number is not prohibited by this chapter when the number is provided to any law enforcement agency, fire protection agency, public health agency, public environmental health agency, city or county emergency services planning agency, or corporation operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one or more of these agencies, when carrying out official duties. Information or records provided to a corporation pursuant to this section must be held in confidence by that corporation and by any individual employed by or associated with that corporation. Such information or records are not open to examination for any purpose not directly connected with carrying out an agency's official duties.

[ 2009 c 401 s 3; 2008 c 271 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 271: See note following RCW 19.250.005.